California, session 20252026, AB454.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Migratory Bird Protection Act.SEC. 2. Section 3513 of the Fish and Game Code, as added by Section 3 of Chapter 349 of the Statutes of 2019, is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 3513 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:3513. It is unlawful to take or possess any migratory bird as designated in the federal Migratory Bird Treaty Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 703 et seq.) before January 1, 2025, any additional migratory bird that may be designated in that federal act after that date, or any part of a migratory bird described in this section, except as provided by rules and regulations adopted by the United States Secretary of the Interior under that federal act before January 1, 2025, or subsequent rules or regulations adopted pursuant to that federal act, unless those rules or regulations are inconsistent with this code.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 5. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to protect California’s hundreds of diverse bird species and the ecosystems that depend on them from the impacts of harmful human activity, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.